Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.015

Industrial statistician to make determinations of prevailing rate.

(1) All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.

(2) The time period for recovery of any wages owed to a worker affected by the determination is tolled until the prevailing wage determination is final.

(3)(a) Except as provided in RCW 39.12.017, and notwithstanding RCW 39.12.010(1), the industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage by adopting the hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid for the geographic jurisdiction established in collective bargaining agreements for those trades and occupations that have collective bargaining agreements. For trades and occupations with more than one collective bargaining agreement in the county, the higher rate will prevail.

(b) For trades and occupations in which there are no collective bargaining agreements in the county, the industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage as defined in RCW 39.12.010 by conducting wage and hour surveys. In instances when there are no applicable collective bargaining agreements and conducting wage and hour surveys is not feasible, the industrial statistician may employ other appropriate methods to establish the prevailing rate of wage.

[ 2019 c 29 s 2. Prior: 2018 c 248 s 1; 2018 c 242 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 29: "The legislature intends that the methodology for establishing the prevailing rates of wages under this act applies only to affordable housing, homeless and domestic violence shelters, and low-income weatherization and home rehabilitation programs." [ 2019 c 29 s 1.]

Effective date—2019 c 29: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 17, 2019]." [ 2019 c 29 s 5.]

Publication of wage rates—Effective date—2019 c 29: See note following RCW 39.12.017.